Utah statutes.
17C-1-503.   Signature of officer who leaves office.

If an agency officer whose signature appears on a bond issued under this part leaves office before delivery of the bond, the signature shall continue to be valid as if the official had remained in office until delivery of the bond.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 359, 2006 General Session

